en: Laboratory Equipment
xx: Laboratory Equipment
cs: Laboratorní vybavení
da: Laboratorieudstyr
de: Laborausstattung
es: Equipo de laboratorio
fr: Matériel de laboratoire
it: Strumenti da laboratorio
ja: 実験器具
nl: Laboratoriumapparatuur
no: Laboratorieutstyr
pl: Sprzęt laboratoryjny
pt: Equipamentos de laboratório
ru: Лабораторное оборудование
sv: Laboratorieutrustning
tr: Laboratuvar Ekipmanları

en: Autoclaves
xx: Autoclaves
cs: Sterilizátory
da: Autoklaver
de: Autoklaven
es: Autoclaves
fr: Autoclaves
it: Autoclavi
ja: 加圧滅菌器
nl: Autoclaven
no: Autoklaver
pl: Autoklawy
pt: Esterilizadores
ru: Автоклавы
sv: Autoklaver
tr: Otoklavlar

en: Centrifuges
xx: Centrifuges
cs: Odstředivky
da: Centrifuger
de: Zentrifugen
es: Centrifugadoras
fr: Centrifugeuses
it: Centrifughe
ja: 遠心分離機
nl: Centrifuges
no: Sentrifuger
pl: Wirówki
pt: Centrífugas
ru: Центрифуги
sv: Centrifuger
tr: Santrifüjler

en: Dry Ice Makers
xx: Dry Ice Makers
cs: Výrobníky suchého ledu
da: Tørismaskiner
de: Trockeneismaschinen
es: Máquinas de hielo seco
fr: Machines de production de glace carbonique
it: Macchine per ghiaccio secco
ja: ドライアイスメーカー
nl: Droogijsmakers
no: Tørrismaskiner
pl: Maszyny do suchego lodu
pt: Máquina de gelo seco
ru: Генераторы сухого льда
sv: Ismaskiner för kolsyreis
tr: Kuru Buz Yapıcılar

en: Freeze-Drying Machines
xx: Freeze-Drying Machines
cs: Lyofilizační zařízení
da: Frysetørringsmaskiner
de: Gefriertrockenmaschinen
es: Máquinas de liofilización
fr: Machines à lyophiliser
it: Macchine per il ghiaccio secco
ja: 凍結乾燥機
nl: Vriesdrogers
no: Frysetørkingsmaskiner
pl: Urządzenia do liofilizacji
pt: Máquinas de liofilização
ru: Лиофильные сушилки
sv: Maskiner för frystorkning
tr: Dondurucu-Kurutucu Makineler

en: Laboratory Blenders
xx: Laboratory Blenders
cs: Laboratorní mixéry
da: Laboratorie – blendere
de: Labormixer
es: Licuadoras para laboratorio
fr: Centrifugeuses de laboratoire
it: Agitatori da laboratorio
ja: 実験用ブレンダー
nl: Mengapparaten voor laboratoriums
no: Laboratorieblendere
pl: Miksery laboratoryjne
pt: Liquidificadores de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные смесители
sv: Laboratoriemixrar
tr: Laboratuvar Karıştırıcıları

en: Laboratory Freezers
xx: Laboratory Freezers
cs: Laboratorní mrazáky
da: Laboratoriefrysere
de: Labor-Gefrierschränke
es: Congeladores de laboratorio
fr: Congélateurs de laboratoire
it: Congelatori da laboratorio
ja: 実験用冷凍庫
nl: Laboratoriumvriezers
no: Laboratoriefrysere
pl: Chłodziarki laboratoryjne
pt: Refrigeradores para laboratório
ru: Лабораторные холодильники
sv: Laboratoriefrysar
tr: Laboratuvar Dondurucuları

en: Laboratory Funnels
xx: Laboratory Funnels
cs: Laboratorní nálevky
da: Laboratorietragte
de: Labortrichter
es: Embudos de laboratorio
fr: Entonnoirs de laboratoire
it: Imbuti da laboratorio
ja: 実験用漏斗
nl: Laboratoriumtrechters
no: Laboratorietrakter
pl: Lejki laboratoryjne
pt: Funis para laboratório
ru: Лабораторные воронки
sv: Laboratorietrattar
tr: Laboratuvar Hunileri

en: Laboratory Hot Plates
xx: Laboratory Hot Plates
cs: Laboratorní vařiče
da: Laboratorie – varmeplader
de: Labor-Heizplatten
es: Placas para calentar de laboratorio
fr: Plaques chauffantes de laboratoire
it: Piastre da laboratorio
ja: 実験用ホットプレート
nl: Warmhoudplaatjes voor laboratoriums
no: Laboratoriekokeplater
pl: Laboratoryjne płyty grzewcze
pt: Placas térmicas de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные электроплитки
sv: Värmeplattor för laboratorier
tr: Laboratuvar Ocakları

en: Laboratory Ovens
xx: Laboratory Ovens
cs: Laboratorní trouby
da: Laboratorie – ovne
de: Laboröfen
es: Hornos de laboratorio
fr: Fours de laboratoire
it: Forni da laboratorio
ja: 実験用オーブン
nl: Ovens voor laboratoriums
no: Laboratorieovner
pl: Piece laboratoryjne
pt: Fornos de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные печи
sv: Laboratorieugnar
tr: Laboratuvar Fırınları

en: Microscope Accessories
xx: Microscope Accessories
cs: Mikroskopy – příslušenství
da: Mikroskop – tilbehør
de: Mikroskopzubehör
es: Accesorios para microscopios
fr: Accessoires pour microscopes
it: Accessori per microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor microscopen
no: Mikroskoptilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do mikroskopu
pt: Acessórios para microscópios
ru: Принадлежности для микроскопов
sv: Mikroskoptillbehör
tr: Mikroskop Aksesuarları

en: Microscope Cameras
xx: Microscope Cameras
cs: Kamery k mikroskopům
da: Mikroskop – kameraer
de: Mikroskopkameras
es: Cámaras para microscopios
fr: Appareils photo pour microscopes
it: Fotocamere per microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡用カメラ
nl: Microscoopcamera's
no: Mikroskopkameraer
pl: Kamery mikroskopowe
pt: Câmeras microscópicas
ru: Камеры для микроскопов
sv: Mikroskopkameror
tr: Mikroskop Kameraları

en: Microscope Eyepieces & Adapters
xx: Microscope Eyepieces & Adapters
cs: Okuláry a adaptéry k mikroskopům
da: Mikroskop – okularer og adaptere
de: Mikroskopokulare & Adapter
es: Adaptadores y oculares para microscopios
fr: Adaptateurs et oculaires pour microscopes
it: Oculari e adattatori microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡用接眼レンズ・アダプター
nl: Oogdoppen en adapters voor microscopen
no: Mikroskopokularer og -adaptere
pl: Okulary i adaptery do mikroskopu
pt: Oculares e adaptadores para microscópios
ru: Окуляры и адаптеры для микроскопов
sv: Mikroskopokular och adaptrar
tr: Mikroskop Göz Mercekleri ve Adaptörleri

en: Microscope Objective Lenses
xx: Microscope Objective Lenses
cs: Čočky do objektivů mikroskopů
da: Mikroskop – objektiver
de: Mikroskop-Objektivlinsen
es: Objetivos para microscopios
fr: Objectifs pour microscopes
it: Obiettivi per microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡用対物レンズ
nl: Objectieflenzen voor microscopen
no: Linser til mikroskopobjektiver
pl: Obiektywy do mikroskopu
pt: Lentes objetivas para microscópios
ru: Объективы для микроскопов
sv: Objektivlinser för mikroskop
tr: Mikroskop Objektif Lensleri

en: Microscope Replacement Bulbs
xx: Microscope Replacement Bulbs
cs: Náhradní žárovky do mikroskopů
da: Mikroskop – pærer
de: Ersatzlampen für Mikroskope
es: Bombillas de repuesto para microscopios
fr: Ampoules de remplacement pour microscopes
it: Lampade per microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡用電球
nl: Vervangende lampen voor microscopen
no: Mikroskoppærer
pl: Zapasowe żarówki do mikroskopu
pt: Lâmpadas de reposição para microscópios
ru: Сменные лампы для микроскопов
sv: Ersättningslampor till mikroskop
tr: Mikroskop Yedek Ampulleri

en: Microscope Slides
xx: Microscope Slides
cs: Sklíčka do mikroskopů
da: Mikroskop – objektglas
de: Objektträger
es: Portaobjetos para microscopios
fr: Lames pour microscopes
it: Vetrini per microscopio
ja: 顕微鏡用スライドガラス
nl: Objectglaasjes voor microscopen
no: Objektglass
pl: Szkiełka podstawowe do mikroskopu
pt: Lâminas para microscópios
ru: Предметные стекла для микроскопов
sv: Objektglas
tr: Mikroskop Slaytları

en: Microscopes
xx: Microscopes
cs: Mikroskopy
da: Mikroskoper
de: Mikroskope
es: Microscopios
fr: Microscopes
it: Microscopi
ja: 顕微鏡
nl: Microscopen
no: Mikroskoper
pl: Mikroskopy
pt: Microscópios
ru: Микроскопы
sv: Mikroskop
tr: Mikroskoplar

en: Microtomes
xx: Microtomes
cs: Mikrotomy
da: Mikrotomer
de: Mikrotome
es: Microtomos
fr: Microtomes
it: Microtomi
ja: ミクロトーム
nl: Microtooms
no: Mikrotomer
pl: Mikrotomy
pt: Micrótomos
ru: Микротомы
sv: Mikrotomer
tr: Mikrotomlar

en: Spectrometer Accessories
xx: Spectrometer Accessories
cs: Spektrometry – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til spektrometre
de: Zubehör für Spektrometer
es: Accesorios para espectrómetros
fr: Accessoires de spectromètres
it: Accessori per spettrometro
ja: 分光計関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor spectrometers
no: Tilbehør til spektrometre
pl: Akcesoria do spektrometrów
pt: Acessórios para espectrômetro
ru: Принадлежности для спектрометров
sv: Tillbehör till spektrometrar
tr: Spektrometre Aksesuarları

en: Spectrometers
xx: Spectrometers
cs: Spektrometry
da: Spektrometre
de: Spektrometer
es: Espectrómetros
fr: Spectromètres
it: Spettrometri
ja: 分光計
nl: Spectrometers
no: Spektrometre
pl: Spektrometry
pt: Espectrômetros
ru: Спектрометры
sv: Spektrometrar
tr: Spektrometreler